Hawaii, session 2026, SB1488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding to subpart D of part V, a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§304A-    University of Hawaii conference center revolving fund.  (a)  There is established the university of Hawaii conference center revolving fund for conference center programs conducted by the university.  The university may establish and collect fees and charges for the costs of providing these services.  All fees, charges, and other moneys collected in conjunction with the conference center programs of the university shall be deposited in separate accounts within the revolving fund.  The university may establish accounts under the university of Hawaii conference center revolving fund to facilitate the administration of this fund among the various campuses and operating units of the university of Hawaii system.  The university is authorized to expend funds from the appropriate account in the revolving fund for all costs associated with conducting conferences, seminars, and courses provided by the conference center programs, including but not limited to expenses for honoraria, hotel and room rentals, food and refreshment, printing and mailing, airfare and per diem, lei, rental of audiovisual equipment, and other conference related services, fees, supplies and materials, without regard to section 103D-1002 and any competitive bidding requirements pursuant to state procurement requirements. (b)  The university shall prepare an annual report to the legislature accounting for all income and expenditures of each separate account within the revolving fund." SECTION 2.  Section 304A-2272, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. ["§304A-2272  Conference center revolving fund; University of Hawaii at Hilo.  (a)  There is established the conference center revolving fund for conference center programs conducted by the University of Hawaii at Hilo.  All fees, charges, and other moneys collected in conjunction with conference center programs shall be deposited in the revolving fund.  The chancellor of the University of Hawaii at Hilo or the chancellorꞌs designee is authorized to expend funds from the revolving fund for all costs associated with conferences, seminars, and courses provided by conference center programs, including but not limited to expenses for honoraria, hotel and room rentals, food and refreshment, printing and mailing, airfare and per diem, lei, rental of audiovisual equipment, and conference supplies and materials, without regard to any competitive bidding requirements pursuant to chapter 103D. (b)  The chancellor of the University of Hawaii at Hilo shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session that includes an accounting for all income and expenditures of the revolving fund under this section."] SECTION 3.  Section 304A-2273, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. ["[§304A-2273]  Community college conference center revolving fund.  (a)  There is established the community college conference center revolving fund for conference center programs conducted by the various community colleges.  All fees, charges, and other moneys collected in conjunction with the conference center program of each community college shall be deposited in separate accounts within the revolving fund.  The chancellor of each community college or a designee is authorized to expend funds from the appropriate account in the revolving fund for all costs associated with conducting conferences, seminars, and courses by the conference center program, including but not limited to expenses for honoraria, hotel and room rentals, food and refreshment, printing and mailing, airfare and per diem, leis, rental of audiovisual equipment, and conference supplies and materials, without regard to section 103D-1002 and any competitive bidding requirements pursuant to state procurement requirements. (b)  The chancellors of the community colleges shall prepare an annual report to the legislature accounting for all income and expenditures of each separate account within the revolving fund."] SECTION 4.  On July 1, 2025, all appropriations and encumbrances in the conference center revolving fund, university of Hawaii at Hilo, and in the community college conference center revolving fund shall be transferred to the university of Hawaii conference center revolving fund. SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for conference center programs among various campuses and operating units of the university of Hawaii system. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 31, 2050.